District of Columbia statutes.
23-1302

Definitions.

As used in this chapter —

(1)

the term “judicial officer” means, unless otherwise indicated, the Supreme Court of the United States, the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit, the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, United States District Court for the District of Columbia, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia or any justice or judge of those courts or a United States commissioner or magistrate; and

(2)

the term “bail determination” means any order by a judicial officer respecting the terms and conditions of detention or release (including any order setting the amount of bail bond or any other kind of security) made to assure the appearance in court of —

(A)

any person arrested in the District of Columbia; or

(B)

any material witness in any criminal proceeding in a court referred to in paragraph (1) of this section.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 640, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
This section is referenced in § 23-1303.
1981 Ed., § 23-1302.
1973 Ed., § 23-1302.